Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Provisions Common to Drainage Districts.

§ 51-33-1.
Soil and water conservation and utilization.

The purpose of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 is to confer certain additional powers on drainage districts already created or to be created under the laws of the State of Mississippi for the purposes of cooperating with the government of the United States and landowners in soil and water conservation and utilization programs for the further development of the economy of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 92, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 176; Laws, 1966, ch. 228, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1966).

§ 51-33-3.
Additional powers for conservation.

To the end that soil and water conservation measures may be improved, flood control and drainage programs strengthened, and the land and water economy of the state stabilized, the following additional powers are conferred upon presently existing drainage districts in the State of Mississippi, including districts with county commissioners as established under Sections 51-31-1 through 51-31-143, and districts established under Sections 51-29-1 through 51-29-165:

To take necessary measures for prevention of erosion, floodwater, and sediment damage; to further the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water; and to adopt necessary regulations, programs, and procedures to accomplish these ends, subject to approval of the chancery court or chancellor and on proper notice to the interested parties as such notice is provided for in the general statutes pertaining to drainage districts.

To cooperate and enter into agreements with and to receive financial and other assistance from state agencies and political subdivisions of the state, other organizations created under state laws, and the government of the United States and agencies thereof to carry out the purposes of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9; to enter into agreements with and to accept contributions from private landowners for the purposes of these sections.

To acquire lands, easements, and rights-of-way in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-1-1 for sites for structures and for the flowage or impoundment of waters, acquisitions for these purposes to be accomplished in the same manner and through the same powers and procedures as under the statutes presently pertaining to drainage districts.

To construct, operate, and maintain works of improvement, including structures and related measures, as are needed to carry out their broadened purposes as set forth herein, subject to approval of the chancery court or chancellor and on proper notice to interested parties as set forth in the drainage district statutes.

To enlarge their boundaries in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-1-1 to permit the construction of additional needed works of improvement, or to construct additional needed works of improvement outside their boundaries, subject to approval of the chancery court and on proper notice to interested parties in the manner set forth in the drainage district statutes.

To make additional assessments and issue bonds for carrying out the purposes of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 and for constructing, maintaining, and operating any structures or improvements established as provided herein, additional assessments or bond issues to be made in the same manner and through the same procedures as under the statutes presently pertaining to drainage districts, subject to approval of the court or chancellor in the same manner, and on the same notice to the interested parties as in the first instance of approving assessments, bond issues, and benefits; and appeal shall lie from decree as in the first instance, and they shall be final only as decrees are final in the first instance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 92, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 176; Laws, 1966, ch. 228, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 51-33-5.
Petition for conservation powers.

Before the additional powers granted by Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 shall become applicable to any drainage district in this state, the commissioners of such district shall file a petition in the chancery court requesting such additional powers as set forth herein, whereupon the chancery clerk shall immediately publish a notice in a newspaper having general circulation in the said drainage district for two successive insertions, giving notice of said petition and designating a date, not less than ten days after the last publication of notice, at which a hearing may be had on said petition; and proceedings shall be conducted in so far as possible in accordance with procedures set forth for determining whether or not the district shall be created in the first instance, and the chancellor shall render his decree accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 92, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 176; Laws, 1966, ch. 228, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1966).

§ 51-33-7.
Creation of district for conservation purposes.

In areas not presently within the boundaries of an existing drainage district, and in areas partially within and partially without the boundaries of existing drainage districts, the real property owners may proceed to organize a drainage district for carrying out the purposes of Sections 51-33-1 to 51-33-9, and such organization of such district may be carried out for said purposes according to any one of the different procedures for organization of drainage districts set forth in chapters 29 and 31 of this title; and after organization such district shall have all the powers vested by law in such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 92, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 176; Laws, 1966, ch. 228, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1966).

§ 51-33-9.
Construction of conservation program.

The purpose of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 is to enable existing drainage districts or newly created drainage districts as provided herein to enter into cooperative agreements and programs to carry out the purposes of Public Law 566, 83rd Congress of the United States, or other laws of the national Congress pertaining to soil and water conservation and utilization. Said sections are to be given a broad construction to the end that those purposes may be carried out; and to this end all political subdivisions of the State of Mississippi, all agencies and departments of the state government, and all soil conservation districts are authorized to cooperate with, expend funds for, and enter into agreements with drainage districts and any agencies of the United States government for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of said sections and said Public Law 566, 83rd Congress, or other laws of the national Congress pertaining to soil and water conservation and utilization.

However, none of the additional powers granted by Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 shall be exercised except for the purpose of participating in a program or programs authorized under Public Law 566, 83rd Congress of the United States, or other laws of the national Congress pertaining to soil and water conservation and utilization.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 92, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 176; Laws, 1966, ch. 228, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1966).

§ 51-33-11.
Additional powers for beneficial use of water.

The general powers granted to drainage districts by the laws under which they were created and those granted to drainage districts under the provisions of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 are further hereby expanded to permit all drainage districts created under said sections, and all those modified by the application of their provisions, and all drainage districts created in the state to exercise the following additional powers:

To construct, operate, and maintain works of improvement, structures, and related measures needed for the impoundment, diversion, flowage, and distribution of waters for beneficial use as defined in subsection (e) of Section 51-3-3.

To make additional assessments and issue bonds for constructing, maintaining, and operating any structure or improvement established as provided herein, in the same manner as outlined in subsection (f) of Section 51-33-3; to contract with the users of water provided for beneficial use for funds to defray the cost of maintaining dams, diversion structures, flumes, channels, pumping costs, and to provide administrative and other costs incident to the sale and beneficial use of water.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.1; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 1.

§ 51-33-13.
Cooperative agreements for conservation programs.

It is the intention of Sections 51-33-9 through 51-33-15 to permit all drainage districts to enter into cooperative agreements and programs and cooperate in carrying out the purposes of Public Law 566, 83rd Congress of the United States, or other laws of the national Congress pertaining to soil and water conservation and utilization, as provided in Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-7, and to implement and give effect to Sections 51-3-1 through 51-3-53 in order to make full beneficial use of available surface water in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.3; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 2.

§ 51-33-15.
Water management district.

Upon the exercise of any power under the provisions of Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9 or under the provisions of Sections 51-33-11 through 51-33-15, a drainage district shall be and become known as a “water management district.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.7; Laws, 1958, ch. 456, § 4.

§ 51-33-17.
Borrowing funds from government agencies.

Drainage districts existing or hereafter created under the laws of the State of Mississippi and having secured the powers conferred by Sections 51-33-1 through 51-33-9, may borrow funds for any purpose authorized by law from state agencies, political subdivisions of the state, other organizations created under state laws, the government of the United States, and agencies thereof, at an interest rate not to exceed five per cent (5%) per annum. The terms of all such loans are to be approved by the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation. Such loans shall be evidenced by the promissory note of said district and shall be executed in the name of the district by its commissioners. As security therefor said commissioners may pledge and assign the entire revenues of said district, not to exceed the amount of benefits or assessments approved and confirmed against the property of said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.6; Laws, 1960, ch. 179.

§ 51-33-19.
Funds for repairs and restoration.

The commissioners of any drainage district organized and existing under any law of this state are hereby authorized and empowered to issue and sell the negotiable certificate of indebtedness of such district as herein provided, for the purpose of providing funds with which to clean out, restore, repair, and rehabilitate the whole or any part of the drainage system of such district; or for the purpose of cooperating with the United States or any agency thereof in such works. No such certificates of indebtedness shall be so issued for the purpose of constructing any new ditches or new works of improvement in any such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4609-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 159.

§ 51-33-21.
Certificates of indebtedness for repairs.

Such certificates of indebtedness shall in no case be issued in a principal amount which, when added to any outstanding certificates of indebtedness issued hereunder, will exceed fifteen per centum (15%) of the total amount of benefits assessed and confirmed against the land and other property within any such district in connection with the original construction of the drainage system therein which is to be so cleaned out, restored, repaired, and rehabilitated, in whole or in part. Such certificates of indebtedness shall bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding sixty (60) months from the date thereof, shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding eight per centum (8%) per annum, payable semiannually, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, and shall be sold in such amount or amounts and at such price or prices not less than their par value and accrued interest, all as shall be determined by resolution of such commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4609-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 159; Laws, 1974, ch. 361, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).

§ 51-33-23.
Tax levy for repairs.

For the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any certificates of indebtedness issued hereunder, there shall annually be levied upon all lands and other property within such district, in proportion to the benefits assessed and confirmed thereon as aforesaid, such a rate of taxation as shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of such principal and interest when due, making due allowance for delinquencies in the payment of such taxes and costs of collection. Such levy shall be made in the same manner and at the same time as and when other tax levies are required by law to be made for such district; and such taxes shall be extended upon the tax books of such district and shall be secured, enforced, and collected at the same time and in the same manner and by the same officials as other taxes of such district are secured, enforced, and collected. All taxes levied hereunder are hereby declared to be taxes for maintenance purposes and shall not diminish in any manner the amount of assessed benefits in any such district which is otherwise available for the payment of any outstanding bonds of such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4609-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 159.

§ 51-33-25.
Hearing on indebtedness for repairs.

Before issuing any certificates of indebtedness hereunder, the commissioners of such district shall give notice of their intention to do so and shall cause such notice to be published in some newspaper having a general circulation in each county wherein such district is situated. Such publication shall be made once each week for two consecutive weeks prior to the date to be named therein, when the commissioners shall meet to hear objections of any interested person as to why such certificates of indebtedness should not be issued and taxes levied for the payment thereof, as herein provided. At the time and place fixed for the holding of such hearing, the commissioners of such district shall hear and act upon all such objections in a summary manner, and their disposition thereof shall be final and conclusive on all parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4609-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 159.

§ 51-33-27.
Authority for indebtedness for repairs.

Sections 51-33-19 through 51-33-27 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the issuance of certificates of indebtedness of drainage districts; and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions, or limitations of law applicable to the borrowing of money by drainage districts shall apply to the issuance and sale of certificates of indebtedness under said sections. No proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such certificates other than those provided for and required therein, and all powers necessary to be exercised by the commissioners of any such drainage district in order to carry out the provisions of said sections are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4609-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 159.

§ 51-33-29.
Cooperative agreements with U.S. Corps of Engineers.

Drainage districts already created or to be created under the laws of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and empowered to enter into cooperative agreements with the U.S. Corps of Engineers to carry out the purposes for which the districts were created, including the power to contract with the said Corps of Engineers for the construction, alteration, changing, or cleaning out of any stream or levee, with the power in the district acting through its commissioners to authorize the letting of contracts therefor by the Corps of Engineers rather than the district.

This section is additional and supplemental to any other statutes of this state affecting drainage districts, and the powers herein conferred affect only the authority of drainage districts to contract with the U.S. Corps of Engineers, as herein stated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.4; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 14.

§ 51-33-31.
Borrowing from Farmers’ Home Administration.

Drainage districts already created or to be created under the laws of this state are hereby authorized and empowered to borrow money from the Farmers’ Home Administration, an agency of the United States, to be used for the purposes for which said districts are created and upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the district and the Farmers’ Home Administration.

This section is additional and supplemental to any other statutes of this state affecting drainage districts, and the powers herein conferred affect only the authority of drainage districts to contract with the Farmers’ Home Administration as herein stated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4606.4; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 14.

§ 51-33-33.
Irrigation of farm lands.

All drainage districts of this state may, in the discretion of the drainage commissions of said district, permit the use of water from the drainage canals and the putting into drainage canals of water from natural bodies of water or streams, for the purpose of irrigation of farm lands, under such restrictions as the districts may impose when, in the judgment of the commissioners acting on the advice of the engineer of the district or any other competent engineer employed by it, such permit or permits will not be detrimental to the district or injurious to the landowners therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4673.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 425; Laws, 1952, ch. 309; Laws, 1954, ch. 155, § 1.

§ 51-33-35.
Contract for irrigation funds.

The drainage commissioners of all drainage districts of this state are hereby authorized, for the purpose of irrigation of farm lands as set out in Section 51-33-33, to contract with the users thereof for the funds with which to provide the water and maintain the ditches for irrigation purposes authorized by Sections 51-33-33 and 51-33-35. However, no contract shall be made whereby the drainage of the lands composing the drainage district, the canals or ditches of which are used for irrigation purposes as herein authorized, shall be destroyed or impaired, it being the purpose and intent of said sections to authorize the use of said canals and ditches for irrigation purposes only in such manner as will not destroy or impair the original and primary purpose of the district to afford drainage to the lands within the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4673.7; Laws, 1954, ch. 155, § 2.

§ 51-33-37.
Bond issue to fund legal indebtedness.

For the purpose of funding or paying any legal indebtedness, now or hereafter outstanding, of any drainage district organized and existing under any law or laws of the state of Mississippi or that may be hereafter organized under any law of the state, to the extent that same when added to the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district shall not exceed the balance due to the district on the assessment of land of the district, the drainage commissioners and court for such district may issue bonds of the district aggregating such amount, provided that interest on such indebtedness may not be calculated against the district in determining the amount of such indebtedness. Such funding bonds shall be of such denominations, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding fifty (50) years from their date, shall be issued in such manner, amount or amounts, and shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, payable semiannually, as the administrative or governing authority of the district may determine. Such bonds may be sold at such price and in such manner as the administrative or governing authority may determine, subject, however, to the approval of the court. Any discount or expense resulting from the sale of such funding bonds may be paid out of any available funds of the district. Such funding bonds shall be signed and executed by the drainage commissioners in charge of the district. However, before issuing such funding bonds hereunder, the administrative or governing authority of such district shall give notice of its intention to do so and shall cause such notice to be published in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county of such district. Such publication shall be made once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date, to be named therein, when the administrative or governing authority shall meet to hear the objections of any interested person as to why such funding bonds should not be issued and taxes levied, within the amount of the assessed benefits, for the purpose of paying the principal and interest on such bonds. At the time and place fixed for the holding of such hearing, the administrative or governing authority of such district shall hear and dispose of all such objections in a summary manner. Any objector having filed his objections prior to the hearing may appeal from the decision of such administrative or governing authority to the chancery court having jurisdiction of the affairs of said district, on making and filing, within ten (10) days from date of hearing, appeal bond in the penal sum of two hundred dollars ($200.00) approved by the clerk of said chancery court, conditioned to pay all costs which may be adjudged against objector.

Taxes for the payment of such bond obligations issued hereunder shall be levied annually on and against the land of the district, as is provided for the levying of other taxes of the district and in proportion to the assessed benefits of the district.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the registered bond act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4439; 1942, § 4644; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 51-33-39.
Refunding bonds.

For the purpose of refunding bonded indebtedness, now or hereafter outstanding, of any drainage district organized and existing under any law or laws of the state of Mississippi or that may be hereafter organized under any law of the state, whenever such drainage district is or may hereafter become unable to pay all or any part of the principal and interest on its bonds, or whenever the best interest of the district may require, the drainage commissioners and court for such district may issue refunding bonds of such district in an amount which shall not exceed the aggregate of the amount of bonds to be refunded and accrued interest thereon. Such refunding bonds shall be of such denomination, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding fifty (50) years from their date, shall be issued in such manner, amount or amounts, and shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, payable semiannually, as the administrative or governing authority of the district may determine. Such refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded, upon consent of the holders thereof, or may be sold at such price and in such manner as the administrative or governing authority may determine, subject however to the approval of the court. Any discount or expense resulting from the sale of such refunding bonds may be paid out of any available funds of the district. If the outstanding bonds shall not have matured, they may be refunded only with the consent of the holder or holders thereof, which consent shall be sufficiently evidenced by the surrender of the bonds to be refunded. Such refunding bonds shall be signed and executed by the drainage commissioners in charge of the district. However, before issuing any refunding bonds hereunder, the administrative and governing authority of such district shall give notice of its intention to do so and shall cause such notice to be published in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county of such district. Such publication shall be made once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date, to be named therein, when the administrative or governing authority shall meet to hear the objections of any interested person as to why such refunding bonds should not be issued and taxes levied, in addition to the assessed benefits, for the purpose of paying interest on such bonds. At the time and place fixed for the holding of such hearing, the administrative or governing authority of such district shall hear and dispose of all such objections in a summary manner, and its disposition thereof shall be final and conclusive on all parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4437; 1942, § 4642; Laws, 1924, ch. 262; Laws, 1928, ch. 236; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 51-33-41.
Payment of refunding bonds.

The administrative or governing authority of each such district issuing refunding bonds as above provided and the board of supervisors of the county or counties shall annually levy a tax upon all lands and property subject thereto in such district, in proportion to the benefits originally assessed and sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds and the principal of any such bonds becoming due the ensuing year, and shall certify the amount of such tax to the tax collector or tax collectors of the county or counties in which the lands are situated and assessed. In levying the tax, account shall be taken of all payments theretofore made for taxes on each specific tract of land in the district, so that each tract of land within the district may ultimately be made to bear its equitable and just proportion of taxes for the district according to the original assessment against it. Such taxes shall be collected and the levy and payment thereof enforced at the time and in the manner and by the means now or hereafter provided for the collection of drainage and levee taxes in such district. The total of such taxes, exclusive of taxes levied for interest on such bonds and on the bonds to be refunded, shall not exceed the benefits assessed upon any tract of land in said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4438; 1942, § 4643; Laws, 1928, ch. 49.

§ 51-33-43.
State sale of tax lands.

No sale of tax lands in any drainage district organized under any of the laws of this state shall be made unless and until the state land commissioner is furnished by the applicant with a certificate signed by the president or secretary of the board of commissioners or other governing authority of the said drainage district in which such land is situated, certifying that arrangements, satisfactory to said board of commissioners for the payment of the drainage taxes accruing upon said land subsequent to the sale for delinquent taxes have been made with the applicant.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4469; 1930, § 4488; 1942, § 4714; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1926, ch. 303; Laws, 1934, ch. 227; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 51-33-45.
District may purchase tax lands.

The board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district organized under any of the drainage laws of this state are hereby authorized to purchase from the state any lands lying within such drainage district which have been sold to the state for delinquent taxes and the title to which, at the time of the filing of the application to purchase, has matured in the state. The board of drainage commissioners of any such drainage district desiring to purchase any such lands from the state shall file an application for the purchase of such lands with the land commissioner. The land commissioner with the approval of the governor may sell any such lands to the board of drainage commissioners of such drainage district at such price as may be authorized by law for the sale of lands to individuals, and such sale shall be made upon the same terms and conditions as are provided by law for the sale of lands to individuals. However, the limitation imposed by law upon the quantity of state forfeited tax lands which may be sold to a single individual shall not apply to sales of lands in drainage districts to the board of drainage commissioners under the provisions of this section. The board of drainage commissioners of such drainage districts are hereby authorized to appropriate money out of any funds on hand belonging to the drainage district for the payment of the purchase price of such land.

The patents to such lands shall be issued to the board of drainage commissioners of such drainage district in the form and manner prescribed by law; and the proceeds of all such sales shall be paid into the state treasury in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4651; Laws, 1935, ch. 61; Laws, 1936, ch. 298.

§ 51-33-47.
Lands conveyed to drainage district liable for state and county taxes.

When lands are purchased by the board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district under the provisions of Section 51-33-45, such land shall be liable thereafter for the state and county taxes levied and assessed against the same to the same extent as if such lands were owned by a natural person or private corporation. It shall be the duty of the tax assessor to assess such lands for taxes in the same manner as other lands are assessed; and if the taxes are not paid when due, it shall be the duty of the tax collector to sell said land for the delinquent taxes due and unpaid at the time and in the manner provided by law for the sale of lands for delinquent taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4087; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 51-33-49.
Sale or lease of tax lands.

The board of commissioners of any drainage district operating under any of the laws of this state may sell, lease, or rent, on the terms and conditions as hereinafter set out, the lands located within the limits of said district which have been heretofore purchased or may hereafter be purchased from the State of Mississippi, or such lands heretofore or hereafter purchased at any tax sale after the time for redemption has expired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4652; Laws, 1936, ch. 297.

§ 51-33-51.
Sale price of tax lands.

Any lands purchased by any drainage district from the State of Mississippi shall not be sold by said district so purchasing the same for less than the amount paid by said district to said state therefor. However, except as provided in Section 51-29-81, any lands purchased by any drainage district at any delinquent tax sales, title to which has matured in the district, shall not be sold by said district so purchasing the same for less than the amount paid therefor by said district at said tax sale plus the amount of all other taxes (exclusive of interest, damages, penalties, and costs) which would have accrued to said lands during the two-year period immediately following the date of sale of said lands for delinquent taxes had the same not been sold therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4653; Laws, 1936, ch. 297.

§ 51-33-53.
Terms of sale of tax lands.

The lands authorized to be sold under the terms of Sections 51-33-49 through 51-33-57 may be sold by the commissioners of the district acquiring the same on such terms and conditions as the board of commissioners of the drainage district selling said lands may designate for the sale thereof in an order to be duly adopted by them and spread on their minutes; however, the said lands shall not be sold for less than the amount set out under Section 51-33-51, and at least one third of the purchase price of said lands shall be paid in cash to the district on the day that the deed is executed and delivered by the commissioners of said district to the purchaser thereof. The board of commissioners of any drainage district selling any lands which are authorized to be sold under the terms of said sections may accept at par value as payment or as part payment of the purchase price thereof any outstanding past-due bonds or coupons of said district selling said lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4654; Laws, 1936, ch. 297.

§ 51-33-55.
Terms of lease of tax lands.

The lands authorized to be leased or rented under the terms of Sections 51-33-49 through 51-33-57 may be leased or rented by the board of commissioners of the drainage district owning the same for a term not to exceed three years at such annual rental and on such terms and conditions as may be prescribed and designated for the lease or rental thereof by an order to be duly adopted by the board of commissioners of said district and entered on their minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4655; Laws, 1936, ch. 297.

§ 51-33-57.
Seal required for conveyance of tax lands.

The deed conveying any lands authorized to be sold by any drainage district under the terms of Sections 51-33-49 through 51-33-57 and any lease contract leasing any lands of any drainage district authorized to be leased under the terms of said sections shall be made under the seal of the drainage district selling or leasing the same, and the same shall be signed for said drainage district by the president and secretary, respectively, of the board of commissioners of the drainage district so selling or leasing the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4656; Laws, 1936, ch. 297.

§ 51-33-59.
Release of land by lump sum payment.

Any owner of land situated in any drainage district of the State of Mississippi, which has an outstanding bonded indebtedness, may secure the release of his land or any part thereof from the lien of the assessment of benefits thereon for drainage purposes by paying to the drainage commissioners the full amount of the outstanding assessed benefits against his property or any part thereof. The drainage commissioners or their duly authorized officer, upon receipt of said fund, shall execute to the property owner a full release of his land from the lien of said assessment and acknowledge said release, which may be recorded by the owner in the office of the chancery clerk of the county where said land is situated. However, nothing herein shall have the effect of releasing any land situated in a drainage district from its liability for annual maintenance taxes as now or which may hereafter be levied.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4658; Laws, 1938, ch. 254.

§ 51-33-61.
Release of lands where indebtedness refinanced through Reconstruction Finance Corporation.

In any drainage district of the State of Mississippi which has an outstanding bonded indebtedness which has been refunded through the Reconstruction Finance Corporation of the United States, and in which all of said refunded indebtedness is owned by the Reconstruction Finance Corporation of the United States, any landowner may secure the release of his lands, or any part thereof, from the lien of the assessment of benefits thereon for drainage purposes by paying to the drainage commissioners, to be by them paid to the Reconstruction Finance Corporation, such an amount as may be agreed upon by the said drainage commissioners and the Reconstruction Finance Corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4659; Laws, 1938, ch. 257.

§ 51-33-63.
Procedure to release lands from Reconstruction Finance Corporation.

Any landowner desiring to take advantage of Sections 51-33-61 and 51-33-63 shall first make application to the drainage commissioners of the district in which his land is located, and it shall thereupon be the duty of the drainage commissioners of such drainage district to enter such application on the minutes of such drainage district and to apply to the Reconstruction Finance Corporation to determine the amount required to be paid for the release of such lands from the lien of said assessment of benefits thereon. After the amount required to be paid for the release of such lands from the lien of said assessment of benefits shall have been determined and agreed upon by the commissioners and the Reconstruction Finance Corporation, the commissioners, with the approval of the chancery court or other court in which the affairs of the drainage district are being administered, or with the approval of the chancellor in vacation, shall be authorized to accept the amount thus agreed upon in full satisfaction and settlement of the lien of said assessment of benefits on said land. Upon said amount being paid by such landowner to the drainage commissioners, such land shall be released from such assessment of benefits by proper order spread upon the minutes of said drainage district, and the amount paid shall be immediately remitted by the drainage commissioners to the Reconstruction Finance Corporation to be applied by it to such bonded indebtedness. The written consent of the Reconstruction Finance Corporation shall also be spread upon the minutes of such drainage district. Nothing herein shall have the effect of releasing any land situated in a drainage district from its liability for annual maintenance taxes as now or which may hereafter be levied.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660; Laws, 1938, ch. 257.

§ 51-33-65.
Release of lands by agreement with commissioners and bondholders.

In any drainage district of the State of Mississippi which has an outstanding bonded indebtedness, any landowner may secure a release of his lands, or any part thereof, from the lien of the assessment of benefits thereon for drainage purposes by paying to the drainage commissioners such an amount as may be agreed upon by the drainage commissioners and the owners of all outstanding bonds of such drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 302, § 1.